California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) To be free from physical, sexual, emotional, or other abuse, corporal punishment, and exploitation.

(3) To receive adequate and healthy food, adequate clothing, grooming and hygiene products, and an age-appropriate allowance. Clothing and grooming and hygiene products shall respect the child’s culture, ethnicity, and gender identity and expression.

(4) To be placed in the least restrictive setting possible, regardless of age, physical health, mental health, sexual orientation, and gender identity and expression, juvenile court record, or status as a pregnant or parenting youth, unless a court orders otherwise.

(5) To be placed with a relative or nonrelative extended family member if an appropriate and willing individual is available.

(6) To not be locked in any portion of their foster care placement, unless placed in a community treatment facility.

(7) To have a placement that utilizes trauma-informed and evidence-based deescalation and intervention techniques, to have law enforcement intervention requested only when there is an imminent threat to the life or safety of a child or another person or as a last resort after other diversion and deescalation techniques have been utilized, and to not have law enforcement intervention used as a threat or in retaliation against the child.

(8) To not be detained in a juvenile detention facility based on their status as a dependent of the juvenile court or the child welfare services department’s inability to provide a foster care placement. If they are detained, to have all the rights afforded under the United States Constitution, the California
 Constitution, and all applicable state and federal laws.

(9) To have storage space for private use.

(10) To be free from unreasonable searches of personal belongings.

(11) To be provided the names and contact information for social workers, probation officers, attorneys, service providers, foster youth advocates and supporters, Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASAs), and education rights holder if other than the parent or parents, and when applicable, representatives designated by the child’s Indian tribe to participate in the juvenile court proceeding, and to communicate with these individuals privately.

(12) To visit and contact siblings, family members, and relatives privately, unless prohibited by court order, and to ask the court for visitation
 with the child’s siblings.

(13) To make, send, and receive confidential telephone calls and other electronic communications, and to send and receive unopened mail, unless prohibited by court order.

(14) To have social contacts with people outside of the foster care system, including, but not limited to, teachers, coaches, religious or spiritual community members, mentors, and friends. If the child is an Indian child, to have the right to have contact with tribal members and members of their Indian community consistent with the prevailing social and cultural conditions and way of life of the Indian child’s tribe.

(15) To attend religious services, activities, and ceremonies of the child’s choice, including, but not limited to, engaging in traditional Native American religious practices.

(16) To participate in extracurricular, cultural, racial, ethnic, personal enrichment, and social activities, including, but not limited to, access to computer technology and the internet, consistent with the child’s age, maturity, developmental level, sexual orientation, and gender identity and expression.

(17) To have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.

(18) To have caregivers, child welfare and probation personnel, and legal counsel who have received instruction on cultural competency and
 sensitivity relating to sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, and best practices for providing adequate care to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender children in out-of-home care.

(19) To be placed in out-of-home care according to their gender identity, regardless of the gender or sex listed in their court, child welfare, medical, or vital records, to be referred to by the child’s preferred name and gender pronoun, and to maintain privacy regarding sexual orientation and gender identity and expression, unless the child permits the information to be disclosed, or disclosure is required to protect their health and safety, or disclosure is compelled by law or a court order.

(20) To have child welfare and probation personnel and legal counsel who have received instruction on the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and on cultural
 competency and sensitivity relating to, and best practices for, providing adequate care to Indian children in out-of-home care.

(21) To have recognition of the child’s political affiliation with an Indian tribe or Alaskan village, including a determination of the child’s membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe or Alaskan village; to receive assistance in becoming a member of an Indian tribe or Alaskan village in which the child is eligible for membership or citizenship; to receive all benefits and privileges that flow from membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe or Alaskan village; and to be free from discrimination based on the child’s political affiliation with an Indian tribe or Alaskan village.

(22) (A) To access and receive medical, dental, vision, mental health, and substance use disorder services, and reproductive and sexual health care, with
 reasonable promptness that meets the needs of the child, to have diagnoses and services explained in an understandable manner, and to participate in decisions regarding health care treatment and services. This right includes covered gender-affirming health care and gender-affirming mental health care, and is subject to existing laws governing consent to health care for minors and nonminors and does not limit, add, or otherwise affect applicable laws governing consent to health care.

(B) To view and receive a copy of their medical records to the extent they have the right to consent to the treatment provided in the medical record and at no cost to the child until they are 26 years of age.

(23) Except in an emergency, to be free of the administration of medication or chemical substances, and to be free of all psychotropic medications unless prescribed by a physician, and in the case
 of children, authorized by a judge, without consequences or retaliation. The child has the right to consult with and be represented by counsel in opposing a request for the administration of psychotropic medication and to provide input to the court about the request to authorize medication. The child also has the right to report to the court the positive and adverse effects of the medication and to request that the court reconsider, revoke, or modify the authorization at any time.

(24) (A) To have access to age-appropriate, medically accurate information about reproductive health care, the prevention of unplanned pregnancy, and the prevention and treatment of sexually transmitted infections.

(B) At any age, to consent to or decline services regarding contraception, pregnancy care, and perinatal care, including, but not limited to, abortion services and health
 care services for sexual assault without the knowledge or consent of any adult.

(C) At 12 years of age or older, to consent to or decline health care services to prevent, test for, or treat sexually transmitted diseases, including HIV, and mental health services, without the consent or knowledge of any adult.

(25) At 12 years of age or older, to choose, whenever feasible and in accordance with applicable law, their own health care provider for medical, dental, vision, mental health, substance use disorder services, and sexual and reproductive health care, if payment for the service is authorized under applicable federal Medicaid law or other approved insurance, and to communicate with that health care provider regarding any treatment concerns or needs and to request a second opinion before being required to undergo invasive medical, dental, or psychiatric treatment.

(26) To confidentiality of medical and mental health records, including, but not limited to, HIV status, substance use disorder history and treatment, and sexual and reproductive health care, consistent with existing law.

(27) To attend school, to remain in the child’s school of origin, to immediate enrollment upon a change of school, to partial credits for any coursework completed, and to priority enrollment in preschool, after school programs, a California State University, and each community college district, and to receive all other necessary educational supports and benefits, as described in the Education Code.

(28) To have access to existing information regarding the educational options available, including, but not limited to, the coursework necessary for career, technical, and postsecondary educational programs,
 and information regarding financial aid for postsecondary education, and specialized programs for current and former foster children available at the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(29) To attend Independent Living Program classes and activities, if the child meets the age requirements, and to not be prevented by caregivers from attending as a consequence or punishment.

(30) To maintain a bank account and manage personal income, consistent with the child’s age and developmental level, unless prohibited by the case plan.

(31) To work and develop job skills at an age-appropriate level, consistent with state law.

(32) For children 14 to 17 years of age, inclusive, to receive a consumer
 credit report provided to the child by the social worker or probation officer on an annual basis from each of the three major credit reporting agencies, and to receive assistance with interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies.

(33) To be represented by an attorney in juvenile court; to have an attorney appointed to advise the court of the child’s wishes, to advocate for the child’s protection, safety, and well-being, and to investigate and report to the court on legal interests beyond the scope of the juvenile proceeding; to speak to the attorney confidentially; and to request a hearing if the child feels their appointed counsel is not acting in their best interest or adequately representing their legal interests.

(34) (A) To receive a notice of court hearings, to attend court hearings, to speak to the judge, to view and receive a copy of the court file,
 subject to existing federal and state confidentiality laws, and to object to or request the presence of interested persons during court hearings. If the child is an Indian child, to have a representative designated by the child’s Indian tribe be in attendance during hearings.

(B) When a child is entitled to receive a copy of the court report, case plan, and transition to independent living plan (TILP), those items shall be provided in the child’s primary language.

(35) To the confidentiality of all juvenile court records consistent with existing law.

(36) To view and receive a copy of their child welfare records, juvenile court records, and educational records at no cost to the child until the child is 26 years of age, subject to existing federal and state confidentiality laws.

(37) To be involved in the development of their own case plan, including placement decisions and placement transition planning, and plan for permanency. This involvement includes, but is not limited to, the development of case plan elements related to placement and gender-affirming health care, with consideration of the child’s gender identity. If the child is an Indian child, the case plan shall include protecting the essential tribal relations and best interests of the Indian child by assisting the child in establishing, developing, and maintaining political, cultural, and social relationships with the child’s Indian tribe and Indian community.

(38) To review the child’s own case plan and plan for permanent placement if the child is 10 years of age or older, and to receive information about their out-of-home placement and case plan, including being told of changes to the plan.

(39) To request and participate in a child and family team meeting, as follows:

(A) Within 60 days of entering foster care, and every six months thereafter.

(B) If placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program, or receiving intensive home-based services or intensive case coordination, or receiving therapeutic foster care services, to have a child and family team meeting at least every 90 days.

(C) To request additional child and family team meetings to address concerns, including, but not limited to, placement disruption, change in service needs, addressing barriers to sibling or family visits, and addressing difficulties in coordinating services.

(D) To have both informal and formal
 support people participate, consistent with state law.

(40) (A) To be informed of these rights in an age and developmentally appropriate manner by the social worker or probation officer and to be provided a copy of the rights in this section at the time of placement, any placement change, and at least once every six months or at the time of a regularly scheduled contact with the social worker or probation officer.

(B) For a child who speaks a primary language other than English, to be provided a copy of the child’s rights in the child’s primary language.

(41) To be provided with contact information for the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services, the tribal authority approving a tribally approved home, and the State Foster Care Ombudsperson, at the time of
 each placement, and to contact any or all of these offices immediately upon request regarding violations of rights, to speak to representatives of these offices confidentially, and to be free from threats or punishment for making complaints.

(b) The rights described in this section are broad expressions of the rights of children in foster care and are not exhaustive of all rights set forth in the United States Constitution and the California Constitution, federal and California statutes, and case law.

(c) This section does not require, and shall not be interpreted to require, a foster care provider to take any action that would impair the health and safety of children in out-of-home placement.

(d) The State Department of Social Services and each county welfare department are encouraged to work with the Student Aid
 Commission, the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to receive information pursuant to paragraph (28) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 564, Sec. 2.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to maintain the continuity of the family unit and ensure the preservation and strengthening of the child’s family ties by ensuring that when siblings have been removed from their home, either as a group on one occurrence or individually on separate occurrences, the siblings will be placed together, unless it has been determined that placement together is contrary to the safety or well-being of any sibling. The Legislature recognizes that in order to ensure the placement of a sibling group in the same foster care placement, placement resources need to be expanded.

(2) It is also the intent of the Legislature to preserve and strengthen
 a child’s sibling relationship so that when a child has been removed from the child’s home and the child has a sibling or siblings who remain in the custody of a parent subject to the court’s jurisdiction, the court has the authority to develop a visitation plan for the siblings, unless it has been determined that visitation is contrary to the safety or well-being of any sibling.

(b) The responsible local agency shall make a diligent effort in all out-of-home placements of dependent children and wards in foster care, including those with relatives, to place siblings together in the same placement and to develop and maintain sibling relationships. If siblings are not placed together in the same home, the social worker or probation officer shall explain why the siblings are not placed together and what efforts the social worker or probation
 officer is making to place the siblings together or why making those efforts would be contrary to the safety and well-being of any of the siblings. When placement of siblings together in the same home is not possible, a diligent effort shall be made, and a case plan prepared, to provide for ongoing and frequent interaction among siblings until family reunification is achieved or, if parental rights are terminated, as part of developing the permanent plan for the child. If the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that sibling interaction is contrary to the safety and well-being of any of the siblings, the reasons for the determination shall be noted in the court order and interaction shall be suspended. The physical capacity of the home shall not be the sole reason to deny placement of a sibling group if each child in the home has an age-appropriate place to sleep and there are no other
 safety risks.

(c) When there has been a judicial suspension of sibling interaction, the reasons for the suspension shall be reviewed at each periodic review hearing pursuant to Section 366 or 727.3. In order for the suspension to continue, the court shall make a renewed finding that sibling interaction is contrary to the safety or well-being of either child. When the court determines that sibling interaction can be safely resumed, that determination shall be noted in the court order and the case plan shall be revised to provide for sibling interaction.

(d) If the case plan for the child has provisions for sibling
 interaction, the child, or the child’s parent or legal guardian, shall have the right to comment on those provisions. If a person wishes to assert a sibling relationship with a dependent child or ward, the person may file a petition in the juvenile court having jurisdiction over the dependent child pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 388 or the ward in foster care pursuant to Section 778.

(e) If parental rights are terminated and the court orders a dependent child or ward to be placed for adoption, the county adoption agency or the State Department of Social Services shall take all of the following steps to facilitate ongoing sibling contact, except in those cases provided in subdivision (b) where the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that sibling interaction is contrary to the safety or well-being of the
 child:

(1) Include in training provided to prospective adoptive parents information about the importance of sibling relationships to the adopted child and counseling on methods for maintaining sibling relationships.

(2) Provide prospective adoptive parents with information about siblings of the child, except the address where the siblings of the children reside. However, this address may be disclosed by court order for good cause shown.

(3) (A) To the extent practicable, the county placing agency shall convene a meeting with the child, the sibling or siblings of the child, the prospective adoptive parent or parents, and a facilitator for the purpose of deciding whether to voluntarily execute a
 postadoption sibling contact agreement pursuant to Section 8616.5 of the Family Code on a date after termination of parental rights and prior to finalization of the adoption. The county placing agency may comply with the requirements of this paragraph by allowing a nonprofit organization authorized to provide permanency placement and postadoption mediation for adoptive and birth families to facilitate the meeting and develop the agreement.

(B) The county placing agency is not required to convene a meeting to decide whether to voluntarily execute a postadoption sibling contact agreement pursuant to Section 8616.5 of the Family Code in either of the following circumstances:

(i) The county placing agency determines that such a meeting or postadoption sibling contact agreement would
 be contrary to the safety and well-being of the child.

(ii) The child requests that a meeting shall not occur.

(C) The child may petition the court for an order requiring the county placing agency to convene a meeting to decide whether to voluntarily execute a postadoption sibling contact agreement pursuant to Section 8616.5 of the Family Code. If the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that a postadoption sibling contact agreement or a meeting for the purpose of deciding whether to voluntarily execute such an agreement is contrary to the safety and well-being of the child, the reasons for the determination shall be noted in the court order, and the meeting is not required to occur.

(D) Counsel to
 the child and counsel to the siblings who are dependents of the court shall be notified of, and may attend, both the meeting and the hearing described in this paragraph.

(E) This paragraph shall not require attendance by a child, sibling, or other party at a meeting to decide whether to voluntarily execute a postadoption sibling contact agreement pursuant to
 Section 8616.5 of the Family Code if the child, sibling, or other party cannot be located or does not wish to attend the meeting. This paragraph shall not prohibit a county placing agency from convening a meeting if not all of the parties are secured to attend.

(f) Information regarding sibling interaction, contact, or visitation that has been authorized or ordered by the court shall be provided to the foster parent, relative caretaker, or legal guardian of the child as soon as possible after the court order is made in order to facilitate the interaction, contact, or visitation.

(g) As used in this section, “sibling” means a person related to the identified child by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.

(h) The court documentation on sibling placements required under this section shall not require the modification of existing court order forms until the Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) is implemented on a statewide basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 137.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to maintain the continuity of the family unit and to support and preserve families headed by minor parents and nonminor dependent parents who are themselves under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court by ensuring that minor parents and nonminor dependent parents and their children are placed together in as family-like a setting as possible, unless it has been determined that placement together poses a risk to the child. It is also the intent of the Legislature to ensure that complete and accurate data on parenting minor and nonminor dependents is collected, and that the State Department of Social Services shall ensure that the following information is publicly available on a quarterly basis by county about parenting minor and nonminor dependents: total number of
 parenting minor and nonminor dependents in each county, their age, their ethnic group, their placement type, their time in care, the number of children they have, and whether their children are court dependents.

(a) To the greatest extent possible, minor parents and nonminor dependent parents and their children shall be provided with access to existing services for which they may be eligible, that are specifically targeted at supporting, maintaining, and developing both the parent-child bond and the dependent parent’s ability to provide a permanent and safe home for the child. Examples of these services may include, but are not limited to, child care, parenting classes, child development classes, and frequent visitation.

(b) Child welfare agencies may provide minor parents and nonminor dependent parents with access to social workers or resource specialists who have received
 training on the needs of teenage parents and available resources, including, but not limited to, maternal and child health programs, child care, and child development classes. Child welfare agencies are encouraged to update the case plans for pregnant and parenting dependents within 60 calendar days of the date the agency is informed of a pregnancy. When updating the case plan, child welfare agencies may hold a specialized conference to assist pregnant or parenting foster youth and nonminor dependents with planning for healthy parenting and identifying appropriate resources and services, and to inform the case plan. The specialized conference shall include the pregnant or parenting minor or nonminor dependent, family members, and other supportive adults, and the specially trained social worker or resource specialist. The specialized conference may include other individuals, including, but not limited to, a public health nurse, a community health worker, or other personnel with a comprehensive knowledge of
 available maternal and child resources, including public benefit programs. Participation in the specialized conference shall be voluntary on the part of the foster youth or nonminor dependent and assistance in identifying and accessing resources shall not be dependent on participation in the conference.

(c) The minor parents and nonminor dependent parents shall be given the ability to attend school, complete homework, and participate in age and developmentally appropriate activities unrelated to and separate from parenting.

(d) Child welfare agencies, local educational agencies, and child care resource and referral agencies may make reasonable and coordinated efforts to ensure that minor parents and nonminor dependent parents who have not completed high school have access to school programs that provide onsite or coordinated child care.

(e) Foster care placements for minor parents and nonminor dependent parents and their children shall demonstrate a willingness and ability to provide support and assistance to minor parents and nonminor dependent parents and their children, shall support the preservation of the family unit, and shall refer a minor parent or nonminor dependent parent to preventive services to address any concerns regarding the safety, health, or well-being of the child, and to help prevent, whenever possible, the filing of a petition to declare the child a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.

(f) Contact between the child, the custodial parent, and the noncustodial parent shall be facilitated if that contact is found to be in the best interest of the child.

(g) For the purpose of this section, “child” refers to the child
 born to the minor parent.

(h) For the purpose of this section, “minor parent” refers to a dependent child who is also a parent.

(i) For the purpose of this section, “nonminor dependent parent” refers to a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who also is a parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 511, Sec. 3.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.5.

(a) Any state funding allocated to counties for the purpose of recruiting, retaining, and supporting foster parents, relative caregivers, and resource families shall be used to increase the capacity and use of home-based family care and the provision of services and supports to such caregivers. Allowable expenditures of those funds shall include, but not be limited to, and shall be used to supplement and not supplant, resources used by a county for any of the following purposes:

(1) Staffing to provide and improve direct services and supports to licensed foster family homes, approved resource families, and relative caregivers, and to remove any barriers in those
 areas
 defined as priorities in the county implementation plan and subsequent reports on outcomes.

(2) Exceptional child needs not covered by the caregiver-specific rate that would normalize the child’s experience, stabilize the placement, or enhance the child’s well-being.

(3) Child care for licensed foster parents, approved resource families, and relative caregivers.

(4) Intensive relative finding, engagement, and navigation efforts.

(5) Emerging technological, evidence-informed, or other nontraditional approaches to outreach to potential foster family homes, resource families, and relatives.

(b) (1) The department shall provide available funding to counties based upon its approval of plans submitted by each county that requests funding described in subdivision (a). Each county plan shall be submitted by September 1 of any year in which funding is available. Each county plan shall include all of the following:

(A) A definition of the specific goal or goals related to increasing the capacity and use of home-based family care and the provision of services and supports to such caregivers that the county intends to achieve.

(B) A description of the strategy or strategies the county proposes to pursue to address the goal or goals identified in subparagraph (A).

(C) An
 explanation or rationale for the proposed strategy or strategies relative to the goal or goals identified in subparagraph (A).

(D) A list or description of the outcomes that shall be reported pursuant to subdivision (c), including baseline data for those outcomes.

(2) The department shall develop, following consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the Chief Probation Officers of California, criteria for the approval of county plans submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) As a condition of accepting state funding described in subdivision (a), counties receiving that funding shall, by September 30 of the year following the end of the fiscal year in which the funding was
 available, report to the department the outcomes achieved through the use of that funding and the activities that contributed to those outcomes. This report from each receiving county shall be made in a manner prescribed by the department, following consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the Chief Probation Officers of California. Using these reports, the department shall share best practices among counties and shall periodically update the Legislature.

(d) Funding for the purposes of this section shall be subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 107.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is an urgent need to develop placement resources to permit minor parents and their children to remain together in out-of-home care when the minor parent is removed from the custody of his or her parents due to abuse or neglect.

(b) To the greatest extent possible, child welfare agencies, in conjunction with providers and the state, and in conjunction with ongoing development of placements and the allocation of existing placement resources, shall identify and utilize whole family placements and other placement models that provide supportive family focused care for dependent teens and their children. In identifying these placements, child welfare agencies shall work with providers and stakeholders to identify and develop programs and program models designed to meet these goals.

(c) In order to effectively plan, identify, and develop needed resources, and effectively address the needs of this population, the department and local child welfare agencies are encouraged to collect data on the number of minors in foster care who give birth and the number of minor parents who remain in placement with their minor children. The department shall aggregate the data annually.

(d) In order to recruit, train, and retain qualified and supportive foster care providers for this population, the department and local child welfare agencies, in consultation with other interested stakeholders, are encouraged to collect information to be used to develop a more cost-effective infant supplemental payment rate structure that more adequately reimburses caregivers for the costs of infant care and teen parent mentoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 841, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

Siblings shall be assigned to the same social worker when there is a prospective adoptive family that intends to adopt the children as a sibling group, unless the responsible local agency finds that assigning the siblings to the same social worker would not be in the best interest of the child or the siblings or the operation of the county office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 353, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16006.

Children and nonminor dependents in out-of-home care shall be placed according to their gender identity, regardless of the gender or sex listed in their court or child welfare records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 805, Sec. 3.   (SB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.

(a) (1) When a child is placed in foster care, the case plan for each child recommended pursuant to Section 358.1 shall include a summary of the health and education information or records, including mental health information or records, of the child. The summary may be maintained in the form of a health and education passport, or a comparable format designed by the child protective agency. The health and education summary shall include, but not be limited to, the names and addresses of the child’s health, dental, and education providers;
 the child’s grade level performance; the child’s school record; assurances that the child’s placement in foster care takes into account proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement; the number of school transfers the child has already experienced; the child’s educational progress, as demonstrated by factors, including, but not limited to, academic proficiency scores; credits earned toward graduation; a record of the child’s immunizations and allergies; the child’s known medical problems; the child’s current medications, past health problems, and hospitalizations; a record of the child’s relevant mental health history; the child’s known mental health condition and medications; and any other relevant mental health, dental, health, and education information concerning the child determined to be appropriate by the Director of Social Services.
 The health and education summary may also include the name and contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child; the name and contact information for the educational liaison, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 48853.5 of the Education Code, of the child’s local educational agency; and the contact information for the nearest foster youth services coordinating program. If any other law imposes more stringent information requirements, then that section shall prevail.

(2) In instances where it is determined that disclosure pursuant to paragraph (1) of the contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child poses a threat to the health and safety of that individual or those individuals, that contact information
 shall be redacted or withheld from the evaluation.

(b) Additionally, a court report or assessment required pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 361.5, Section 366.1, subdivision (d) of Section 366.21, or subdivision (c) of Section 366.22 shall include a copy of the current health and education summary described in subdivision (a), including the name and contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child. With respect to a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, a copy of the current health and education summary shall be included in the court report only if and when the nonminor dependent consents in writing to its inclusion.

(c) As soon as possible, but not later than 30 days after
 initial placement of a child into foster care, the child protective agency shall provide the caregiver with the child’s current health and education summary as described in subdivision (a). For each subsequent placement of a child or nonminor dependent, the child protective agency shall provide the caregiver with a current summary as described in subdivision (a) within 48 hours of the placement. With respect to a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, the social worker or probation officer shall advise the young adult of the social worker’s or probation officer’s obligation to provide the health and education summary to the new caregiver and the court, and shall discuss with the youth the benefits and liabilities of sharing that information.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 827 or any
 other law, the child protective agency may disclose any information described in this section to a prospective caregiver or caregivers prior to placement of a child if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The child protective agency intends to place the child with the prospective caregiver or caregivers.

(B) The prospective caregiver or caregivers are willing to become the adoptive parent or parents of the child.

(C) The prospective caregiver or caregivers have an approved adoption assessment or home study, a foster family home license, certification by a licensed foster family agency, or approval pursuant to the requirements in Sections 361.3 and 361.4.

(2) In addition to the information required to be provided under this section, the child protective agency may disclose to the prospective caregiver specified in paragraph (1), placement history or underlying source documents that are provided to adoptive parents pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 8706 of the Family Code.

(e) The child’s caregiver shall be responsible for reviewing and receiving pupil records pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 49069.3 of the Education Code for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 49069.3 of the Education Code. The child’s caregiver shall be responsible for obtaining and maintaining accurate and thorough information from physicians and educators for the child’s summary as described in subdivision (a) during the time that the child is in the care of the caregiver.